Utah statutes.
70A-7a-501.   Form of negotiation and requirements of due negotiation.
(1)  The following rules apply to a negotiable tangible document of title:
(a)  If the document's original terms run to the order of a named person, the
document is negotiated by the named person's indorsement and delivery.  After
the named person's indorsement in blank or to bearer, any person may negotiate
the document by delivery alone.
(b)  If the document's original terms run to bearer, it is negotiated by
delivery alone.
(c)  If the document's original terms run to the order of a named person and
it is delivered to the named person, the effect is the same as if the document
had been negotiated.
(d)  Negotiation of the document after it has been indorsed to a named person
requires indorsement by the named person and delivery.
(e)  A document is duly negotiated if it is negotiated in the manner stated in
this Subsection (1) to a holder that purchases it in good faith, without
notice of any defense against or claim to it on the part of any person, and
for value, unless it is established that the negotiation is not in the regular
course of business or financing or involves receiving the document in
settlement or payment of a monetary obligation.
(2)  The following rules apply to a negotiable electronic document of title:
(a)  If the document's original terms run to the order of a named person or to
bearer, the document is negotiated by delivery of the document to another
person.  Indorsement by the named person is not required to negotiate the
document.
(b)  If the document's original terms run to the order of a named person and
the named person has control of the document, the effect is the same as if the
document had been negotiated.
(c)  A document is duly negotiated if it is negotiated in the manner stated in
this subsection to a holder that purchases it in good faith, without notice of
any defense against or claim to it on the part of any person, and for value,
unless it is established that the negotiation is not in the regular course of
business or financing or involves taking delivery of the document in
settlement or payment of a monetary obligation.
(3)  Indorsement of a nonnegotiable document of title neither makes it
negotiable nor adds to the transferee's rights.
(4)  The naming in a negotiable bill of lading of a person to be notified of
the arrival of the goods does not limit the negotiability of the bill or
constitute notice to a purchaser of the bill of any interest of that person in
the goods.
